Hawaii, session 2026, SB1183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that māmaki (Pipturus albidus) is a plant that is endemic to the Hawaiian islands, meaning that the Hawaiian islands are the only place in the world where māmaki grows naturally.  Māmaki is found across the entire Hawaiian island chain from the island of Kauai to the island of Hawaii and flourishes at elevations between four hundred feet and six thousand feet. The legislature further finds that māmaki tea is a growing agricultural commodity and believes that the implementation of labeling requirements would ensure the viability of Hawaii-grown māmaki tea. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to protect Hawaii‑grown māmaki tea by imposing labeling requirements for māmaki tea. SECTION 2.  Chapter 486, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§486- Māmaki tea; labeling requirements.  (a) No label on a consumer package shall contain language stating that the package contains or includes tea or dried leaves from the plant Pipturus albidus unless one hundred per cent of the tea or dried leaves were grown in the State.  The ingredient list on such a label shall include the words "100% Hawaii-Grown Māmaki Tea", "Hawaii‑Grown Māmaki Tea", "100% Hawaiian Māmaki Tea", or "Hawaiian Māmaki Tea". (b)  Any nonconsumer package containing tea or dried leaves from the plant Pipturus albidus grown in the State and introduced into intrastate or interstate commerce shall bear on the package a label stating that the package contains Hawaii-grown māmaki tea by using the words "Hawaii-grown māmaki tea". This label shall be required in addition to all other labeling requirements specified in this chapter. (c)  Any person keeping, offering, displaying, exposing for sale, or soliciting for sale any tea or dried leaves from the plant Pipturus albidus shall make available to the administrator, upon demand, documented proof that the māmaki tea was grown in the State. (d)  Any person who violates this section shall be subject to penalties under section 486-32." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________